Louisiana, session 2026, SB467.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 2124(B)(1)(a) and (D) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 2124. Security to be furnished for an appeal
* * *
B. The security to be furnished for a suspensive appeal is determined in
accordance with the following rules:
(1) When the judgment is for a sum of money, the amount of the security
shall be equal to the amount of the judgment, including the interest allowed by the
judgment to the date the security is furnished, exclusive of the costs.
(a) However, in all cases, except litigation related to the Tobacco Master
Settlement Agreement, or any litigation where the state is a judgment creditor, where
the amount of the judgment exceeds one hundred fifty million dollars, the trial court,
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1099 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 467
upon motion and after a hearing, may, in the exercise of its broad discretion, fix the
security in an amount sufficient to protect the rights of the judgment creditor while
at the same time preserving the favored status of appeals in Louisiana.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in any civil action
to which this Subparagraph applies, the aggregate amount of security required
for a suspensive appeal of any one judgment shall not exceed one hundred fifty
million dollars, exclusive of costs.
* * *
D. For good cause shown, the trial judge in the case of the appeal of a money
judgment to be secured by a surety bond may fix the amount of the security at an
amount not to exceed one hundred fifty percent of the amount of the judgment,
including the interest allowed by the judgment to the date the security is furnished,
exclusive of the costs, or one hundred fifty million dollars, exclusive of costs,
whichever is less.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.